New Jersey, session 221, A4336.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.203 (C.55:13C-2.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  No person shall be refused admittance to an emergency shelter for the homeless based on a perception or belief that the person: (1) has a mental illness; (2) is a drug or alcohol dependent person, as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2; (3) is not in compliance with a prescription medication regimen; or (4) has consumed alcoholic beverages off the premises, unless there is a reasonable basis to believe that the person poses a danger to self, others, or property, or if the basis for the refusal is otherwise authorized by law or regulation. b.    Nothing in subsection a. of this section shall prohibit an emergency shelter for the homeless from prohibiting the possession or consumption of controlled dangerous substances, as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2, or alcoholic beverages on the premises. (cf: P.L.2013, c.203, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.